modules/nlb/braille/src/main/resources/hyph/hyph_nb_NO.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
.agn1
.ake1l
.alba1
.all1s
.als1l
.an1føre
.an1gj
.angst1
.anke1p
.an1ord
.an1ri
.anti1g
.ape1
.arm1band.
.arm1banda
.arm1bande
.arm1bånd.
.arm1bånde
.arve1r
.ar1vi
.atter1hald.
.auge1b
.augne1b
.aus1k
.auster1
.av1bre
.av1brot.
.av1brota
.av1brote
.av1brott
.av1brudd.
.av1brudde
.av1bry
.av1bu
.av1fe
.av1hør.
.av1høra
.av1høre
.av1hørt
.av1høy
.av1id
.av1kjøle
.av1kjøling.
.av1kjølinge
.av1kjølt
.av1kok
.av1korte
.av1korting.
.av1kortinga
.av1kortinge
.av1laste
.av1lasting.
.av1lastinga
.av1lastinge
.av1lastning.
.av1lastninge
.av1leg
.av1lei
.av1lesing.
.av1lesinga
.av1lesning.
.av1lesninge
.av1lesningsx
.av1levering.
.av1leveringe
.av1luk
.av1lytte
.av1lytting.
.av1lyttinga
.av1lyttinge
.av1merking.
.av1merkinge
.av1renning.
.av1renninga
.av1renninge
.av1ri
.av1rø
.av1sa
.av1sei
.av1skjer
.av1skjæ
.av1sko
.av1skrekking.
.av1skrekkinga
.av1skrekkinge
.av1skrif
.av1sm
.av1spa
.av1str
.av1støp
.av1stå
.av1sv
.av1try
.av1veie
.av1veining.
.av1veininge
.av1venning.
.av1venninga
.av1venninge
.av1venningsx
.av1verg
.av1verj
.av1vir
.bad1stua
.bad1stue.
.bad1stuen
.bane1
.barne1haga
.barne1hage.
.barne1hagen.
.barne1hagene.
.barne1hagens
.barne1hager.
.barne1have.
.barne1haven.
.barne1havene.
.barne1havens
.barne1haver
.baro1meter.
.baro1metera
.baro1metere
.baro1metr
.bein1s
.berg1art.
.berg1arta
.berg1arte
.be1sa
.be1sitte.
.be1sitter
.be1ta1le
.bil1v
.bi1røkter.
.bi1røktere
.bi1røktern
.bispe1s
.bi1virkning.
.bi1virkninge
.bok1hande
.bok1handlan
.bok1handlar.
.bok1handlaran
.bok1handlarar
.bok1handlare
.bok1handlary
.bok1handler.
.bok1handlere
.bok1handlern
.bok1handlery
.bok1l
.bok1sk
.bo1p
.bort1f
.bo1stede
.brenne1vin.
.brenne1vine
.brenn1stoff.
.brenn1stoffe
.brots1m
.brots1v
.brotts1v
.brudd1
.bu1la
.bu1p
.by1a
.bygg1ve
.by1l
.by1råd.
.by1råde
.by1skriver.
.by1skrivere.
.by1skriveren
.by1skriveres
.by1skrivern
.bytte1
.bære1
.come1back.
.dag1bok.
.dag1boka
.dag1boke
.dag1bø
.dame1
.data1basa
.data1base.
.data1basen
.data1baser.
.data1k
.data1m
.data1s
.dato1
.de1g
.de1kompon
.de1komposisjon.
.de1komposisjone
.del1a
.del1ei
.del1l
.del1p
.del1s
.de1ran
.der1et
.desk1
.des1o
.ding1s
.driv1k
.døds1fall.
.døds1falla
.døds1fallen
.døds1fallet
.dør1s
.dø1vi
.edel1
.efter1f
.efter1le
.efter1m
.efter1s
.eg1enhet
.egg1s
.eier1
.eigar1
.ek1sem1pel.
.elg1r
.el1u
.en1a
.encefalo1
.ene1d
.ene1t
.enges1
.eng1s
.en1m
.en1si
.en1sp
.en1str
.en1sy
.enøk1
.erme1
.esel1
.eske1
.espe1
.eter1
.et1st
.etter1f
.etter1ko
.etter1le
.etter1m
.etter1sl
.etter1sp
.etter1sy
.fag1k
.fag1r
.fag1s
.fall1se
.fangst1
.far1vatn.
.far1vatna
.far1vatne
.fast1s
.fe1dri
.felt1
.feste1
.fest1spel.
.fest1spela
.fille1
.fjell1d
.flod1
.fly1d
.fly1plass.
.fly1plassane
.fly1plassar.
.fly1plasse
.fly1plassy
.fly1ruta
.fly1rute.
.fly1ruten
.fly1ruter
.fly1sta
.fly1vi
.for1anstal
.for1beredt
.fore1bygge
.fore1bygging.
.fore1bygginge
.fore1k
.for1flytting.
.for1flyttinga
.for1høg
.for1kal
.for1kje
.for1kv
.formynder1
.fornær1
.for1or
.for1sei
.for1skudd.
.for1skyving.
.for1tal
.for1tet
.forut1sa
.for1ø
.fot1ball.
.fra1fa
.fram1fø
.fram1ka
.fram1leg
.fram1møte.
.fram1møtet.
.fram1sk
.fram1stø
.fram1syning.
.fram1syninga
.fram1v
.fra1sk
.fra1trekk.
.fra1trekke
.frem1f
.frem1gang.
.frem1gange
.frem1ka
.frem1leg
.frem1møte.
.frem1møtet
.frem1skriv
.frem1sp
.frem1stilling.
.frem1stillinge
.frem1stillingsx
.frem1stilt
.frem1stø
.frem1v
.fri1finni
.fri1gjøring.
.fri1gjøringe
.frå1hald.
.frå1halda
.frå1halde
.frå1haldsx
.frå1sk
.frå1ve
.frå1vær.
.frå1være
.full1byrde
.full1byrding.
.full1byrdinga
.full1byrdinge
.full1byrdingsx
.full1e
.fyll1p
.fyr1v
.føre1bygging.
.føre1bygginga
.føre1byggj
.føre1mi
.føre1mål.
.føre1måla
.føre1måle
.føre1re
.føre1se
.føre1st
.gang1sp
.gen1et
.gen1s
.gen1te
.gift1s
.gjen1forei
.gjen1forening.
.gjen1foreninga
.gjen1foreninge
.gjen1forent
.gjen1kje
.gjen1te
.gjen1vinning.
.gjen1vinninga
.gjen1vinninge
.gjen1vinningsa
.gjen1vinningsx
.gjere1
.gjøre1
.godt1g
.golv1
.grav1ferd.
.grav1ferda
.grav1ferde
.grav1p
.grav1s
.grense1sn
.gress1
.grus1
.grøn1sake
.guds1tenest.
.guds1tenesta
.guds1teneste.
.guds1tenesten
.guds1tenester
.guds1tjeneste.
.guds1tjenesten
.guds1tjenester
.gulv1
.hale1
.halv1de
.halv1timen
.halv1ø
.halv1år.
.halv1åra
.halv1åre
.hand1ball.
.hand1balle
.hand1bo
.hand1bø
.hand1d
.hand1h
.hand1kle.
.hand1klea
.hand1kled
.hand1klee
.hand1klæ
.hand1sl
.hand1t
.hane1
.hav1i
.hav1st
.heilag1
.hekse1
.hellig1do
.helse1tj
.hel1st
.hel1su
.herre1dø
.hev1a
.hjelpe1middel.
.hjelpe1middele
.hjelpe1midl
.hjul1
.hode1
.holde1
.hoved1stad.
.hoved1stade
.hovud1stad.
.hovud1stade
.hug1ste
.hus1hald.
.hus1halda
.hus1halde
.hus1mor.
.hus1mora
.hus1mø
.hær1
.høg1skola
.høg1skole.
.høg1skolen.
.høg1skolene
.høg1skolens
.høg1skoler.
.høg1skolers
.høg1skoles.
.høg1skoley
.høg1skula
.høg1skule.
.høg1skulen.
.høg1skuley
.høg1tid.
.høg1tida
.høg1tide
.høne1
.høy1skole.
.høy1skolen.
.høy1skolene
.høy1skolens
.høy1skoler.
.høy1skolers
.høy1skoles.
.høy1skoley
.hånd1ball.
.hånd1balle
.hånd1balls.
.hånd1bo
.hånd1bø
.hånd1heve
.hånd1heving.
.hånd1hevinge
.hånd1hevingsx
.hånd1kle.
.hånd1klæ
.hånd1sl
.hånd1ta
.il1b
.il1g
.il1leg
.il1li
.il1s
.il1t
.in1a
.in1dep
.inn1ber
.inn1bet
.inn1bin
.inn1bl
.inn1dele
.inn1deling.
.inn1delinga
.inn1delinge
.inn1delings.
.inn1delingy
.inn1delt
.inn1draging.
.inn1draginga
.inn1dragning.
.inn1dragninge
.inn1dri
.inne1havar.
.inne1havara
.inne1havare
.inne1haver.
.inne1havere
.inne1havern
.inne1havery
.inne1havi
.inne1l
.inn1flytting.
.inn1flyttinga
.inn1fy
.inn1før.
.inn1føre
.inn1føring.
.inn1føringa
.inn1føringe
.inn1førsel.
.inn1førsele
.inn1førsla
.inn1førsle.
.inn1ført
.inn1gy
.inn1he
.inn1j
.inn1kalle
.inn1kalling.
.inn1kallinga
.inn1kallinge
.inn1kas
.inn1kjøp.
.inn1kjøpa
.inn1kjøpe
.inn1kjøpsx
.inn1kjøpt
.inn1ko
.inn1kreving.
.inn1krevinge
.inn1krevingsx
.inn1krevj
.inn1lag
.inn1lede
.inn1leia
.inn1leiing.
.inn1leiinga
.inn1lem
.inn1lever
.inn1ly
.inn1løp.
.inn1løpa
.inn1løpe
.inn1løsning.
.inn1løsninge
.inn1løysing.
.inn1løysinga
.inn1samling.
.inn1samlinga
.inn1samlinge
.inn1satt
.inn1seiling.
.inn1seilinga
.inn1seilinge
.inn1setjing.
.inn1setjinga
.inn1sett.
.inn1sette
.inn1skot.
.inn1skota
.inn1skote
.inn1skr
.inn1sn
.inn1sparing.
.inn1sparinga
.inn1sparinge
.inn1strø
.inn1syn.
.inn1syne
.inn1synsx
.inter1nas
.iono1
.ip1
.is1a
.is1br
.is1have
.is1ka
.is1ku
.is1lag
.is1leg
.is1lø
.is1m
.is1p
.is1s
.is1tap
.is1tes
.is1ti
.is1tj
.is1v
.is1ø
.jam1s
.jern1bana
.jern1bane.
.jern1banen.
.jern1banene.
.jern1banens
.jern1baner.
.jord1bruk.
.jord1bruke
.jord1bær.
.jord1bære
.jord1mor.
.jord1mora
.jord1more
.jord1mø
.jord1r
.jul1a
.kapp1k
.kapp1l
.karm1
.kart1legging.
.kart1legginga
.kart1legginge
.kart1v
.kilo1meter.
.kilo1metere
.kilo1metern
.kina1
.kinn1
.kino1v
.kirke1ga
.kirke1gård.
.kirke1gårde
.kjenne1
.kjøp1mann.
.kjøp1manne
.kjøp1me
.kne1s
.knip1p
.kors1bånd.
.kors1bånde
.kose1
.kraft1verk.
.kraft1verka
.kraft1verke
.kraft1verks.
.kraft1verky
.krets1lø
.krig1f
.kring1kasta
.kring1kaste
.kring1kasting.
.kring1kastinga
.kring1kastinge
.kring1kastings.
.kring1kastingsx
.kring1s
.krins1la
.kule1
.kunde1
.ku1ve
.kyrkje1gard.
.kyrkje1garda
.kyrkje1garde
.kyrkje1lyd.
.kyrkje1lyda
.kyrkje1lyde
.kø1s
.lag1d
.lag1mann.
.lag1manne
.lag1me
.lag1st
.land1a
.land1må
.lands1by.
.lands1byan
.lands1byar
.lands1bye
.lands1kamp.
.lands1kampan
.lands1kampar.
.lands1kampe
.lands1møta
.lands1møte.
.lands1møtet.
.lang1sy
.lars1
.laus1l
.laus1øyra
.laus1øyre.
.laus1øyren
.lav1pris.
.ledd1gikt.
.ledd1gikta
.ledd1gikte
.leder1
.leg1do
.leike1tøy.
.leike1tøya.
.leike1tøye
.lein1s
.ler1s
.le1sku
.les1v
.lete1
.lier1
.liga1
.like1vekt.
.like1vekta
.like1vekte
.like1vektsx
.lik1t
.lim1a
.lin1je.
.lin1k
.los1t
.lov1a
.lov1b
.lov1givi
.lov1gjeving.
.lov1gjevinga
.lue1
.lut1r
.lut1v
.lys1bilde.
.lys1bilden
.lys1bilder
.lys1bildet
.lys1bileta
.lys1bilete
.lyse1s
.lys1v
.lære1bok.
.lære1boka.
.lære1bokas
.lære1boke
.lære1bø
.lønns1tab
.lønns1vekst.
.lønns1vekste
.løper1
.løs1l
.løv1s
.låne1
.makt1s
.mal1s
.malt1
.med1arbeiders.
.med1h
.med1k
.med1r
.med1ver
.milli1meter.
.milli1metere
.misleg1
.mislig1ho
.mogleg1
.mot1p
.mul1e
.møte1
.måle1s
.mål1g
.mål1lag.
.mål1laga
.mål1lage
.mål1sa
.mål1set
.mål1st
.mål1va
.natt1s
.nazi1
.ned1bryta
.ned1bryte
.ned1brytning.
.ned1brytninge
.ned1brytningsx
.ned1by
.ned1fall.
.ned1falle
.ned1gang.
.ned1ganga
.ned1gange
.ned1i
.ned1kor
.ned1la
.ned1leggelse.
.ned1leggelsen
.ned1leggelser
.ned1legging.
.ned1legginga
.ned1legginge
.ned1rusting.
.ned1rustinga
.ned1rustinge
.ned1rustning.
.ned1rustninge
.ned1se
.ned1sk
.ned1slag.
.ned1slaga
.ned1slage
.ned1st
.ned1t
.nest1leiar.
.nest1leiare
.nett1verk.
.nett1verka
.nett1verke
.no1l
.nord1mann.
.nord1manne
.nord1manns.
.nord1me
.nord1vestli
.ny1ba
.ny1i
.ny1kl
.ny1ren
.nær1v
.okse1
.olde1f
.olde1m
.olje1s
.om1ar
.om1be
.om1brekking.
.om1brekkinga
.om1brekkinge
.om1brekkingsx
.om1bæ
.om1danne
.om1danning.
.om1danninga
.om1de
.om1dreining.
.om1dreininge
.om1fl
.om1ford
.om1formern
.om1laup.
.om1laupe
.om1legging.
.om1legginga
.om1legginge
.om1leggingsx
.om1legn
.om1o
.om1p
.om1re
.om1ri
.om1sa
.om1sei
.om1sett
.om1sk
.om1sta
.om1sv
.ond1si
.opp1bevaring.
.opp1bevaringa
.opp1bevaringe
.opp1bl
.opp1bo
.opp1bu
.opp1bygd
.opp1bygge
.opp1bygging.
.opp1bygginga
.opp1bygginge
.opp1byggingsx
.opp1bygn
.opp1datering.
.opp1dateringe
.opp1de
.opp1el
.opp1fr
.opp1fu
.opp1he
.opp1kjøp.
.opp1kjøpa
.opp1kjøpe
.opp1kjør
.opp1kr
.opp1lat
.opp1les
.opp1livn
.opp1løse
.opp1løsning.
.opp1løsninge
.opp1løsningy
.opp1løst
.opp1løyse
.opp1løysing.
.opp1løysinga
.opp1mann.
.opp1manne
.opp1men
.opp1møte.
.opp1møtet
.opp1nem
.opp1nevning.
.opp1nevninge
.opp1nevnt
.opp1of
.opp1reisi
.opp1reisning.
.opp1reisninga
.opp1reisninge
.opp1rek
.opp1ring
.opp1ru
.opp1rydding.
.opp1ryddinga
.opp1rydning.
.opp1rydninge
.opp1rykk.
.opp1rykka
.opp1rykke
.opp1sa
.opp1set
.opp1skriv
.opp1sp
.opp1start.
.opp1starte
.opp1starting.
.opp1startinge
.opp1sti
.opp1stod
.opp1sty
.opp1stå
.opp1sv
.opp1syne
.opp1teke.
.opp1teken
.opp1tekn
.opp1telj
.opp1telling.
.opp1tellinge
.opp1tening.
.opp1teninga
.opp1tjening.
.opp1tjeninge
.opp1tjenings.
.opp1tjent
.opp1trek
.opp1tri
.opp1tø
.opp1varming.
.opp1varminga
.opp1varminge
.opp1vekk
.opp1visi
.opp1visning.
.opp1visninga
.opp1visninge
.ord1bok.
.ord1boka
.ord1boke
.ord1br
.ord1bø
.ord1fører.
.ord1førere
.ord1førern
.ord1førers.
.ord1førery
.ord1l
.ord1s
.oven1t
.over1be
.over1bygd
.over1bygg.
.over1bygga
.over1bygge
.over1bygning.
.over1bygninga
.over1bygninge
.over1del
.over1dose.
.over1dosen
.over1doser
.over1dr
.over1fla
.over1grep.
.over1grepa
.over1grepe
.over1gri
.over1h
.over1i
.over1ko
.over1leg
.over1lever
.over1natting.
.over1nattinga
.over1nattinge
.over1settelse.
.over1settelsen
.over1settelser
.over1settelses.
.over1settelsesx
.over1setter.
.over1settere
.over1settern
.over1sit
.over1skot.
.over1skota
.over1skote
.over1skott.
.over1skotta
.over1skotte
.over1skrid
.over1skrift.
.over1skudd.
.over1skudde
.over1sky
.over1slag.
.over1slaga
.over1slage
.over1syk
.over1syn.
.over1syna
.over1syne
.over1tagelse.
.over1tagelsen
.over1tagelser
.over1takelse.
.over1takelsen
.over1taking.
.over1takinga
.over1tar
.over1tred
.over1trekk.
.over1trekka
.over1trekke
.over1ve
.over1vinn
.over1våke.
.over1våker.
.over1våket
.over1våking.
.over1våkinga
.over1våkinge
.over1våkingsx
.over1våkning.
.over1våkninge
.over1våkningsx
.ov1m
.patte1
.pengeinn1k
.pest1
.plan1ko
.plan1leggj
.pop1p
.pore1
.prima1donna.
.prima1donnae
.program1vare.
.program1varen
.puls1
.på1driva
.på1driver.
.på1drivere
.på1drivern
.på1fy
.på1k
.på1legge
.på1skr
.på1te
.på1tr
.radio1sta
.rate1
.rav1s
.rede1g
.redo1
.re1gen
.regn1v
.reiar1
.rein1gjering.
.rein1gjeringa
.rekke1f
.rekkje1f
.rekk1v
.re1lan
.re1mo
.re1part
.re1pro
.re1str
.rett1led
.rett1leia
.rett1leiing.
.rett1leiinga
.rett1skri
.ride1
.ris1p
.ro1ar
.rokke1
.rom1st
.ror1m
.rors1k
.rot1s
.rov1dyr.
.rov1dyre
.rulle1b
.rød1r
.rør1led
.rør1lei
.røste1
.røyr1lei
.råde1rett.
.råde1rette
.råd1giving.
.råd1gjevar.
.råd1gjevara
.råd1gjevare
.råd1gjeving.
